Georgia, session 2025_26, SB162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 34 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
Georgia Composite Medical Board, is amended in Code Section 43-34-6, relating to board
as an independent agency, by adding new subsections to read as follows:
"(k) No later than October 1, 2025, the board shall implement a data management software
system to streamline and automate the licensing process for physicians, physician
assistants, and anesthesiologist assistants. No later than January 1, 2026, such system shall
be fully operational for other healthcare providers licensed by the board.
(l) The system provided for in subsection (k) of this Code section may:
S. B. 162
- 1 -

LC 52 0813S (SCS)
(1) Organize, verify, and store the licenses of healthcare providers, allowing for a single
verification process that results in authorization state wide, provided that a healthcare
facility, licensee, or applicant inputs the credentialing information and agrees to such
authorization;
(2) If available, be customizable so that a healthcare facility can add requirements to
meet such facility's rules, regulations, or bylaws;
(3) Provide a public facing page that is easily and securely accessible by other state
medical boards, healthcare providers, and healthcare facilities;
(4) Notify any individual submitting credentials into such system when his or her
application is deficient, what such deficiency is, and when such application is complete;
(5) Process complete applications within 30 days and process reappointments within two
weeks;
(6) Provide for the registration of nurse protocol agreements for advanced practice
registered nurses and job descriptions for licensed physician assistants and
anesthesiologist assistants;
(7) Allow any healthcare facility to accept the information for licensing as acceptance
for credentialing and any healthcare provider to add additional requirements for
credentialing in their facility; and
(8) Perform any other functions the board deems necessary to improve licensing
processes under this chapter."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 162
- 2 -